Alabama, session 2026rs, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 14-3-45, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§14-3-45
The diet of convictsinmates in quantity and quality
mustshall be such as may be directed by the BoardDepartment of
Corrections, and shall be sound and wholesome, and shall be
prepared and served subject to the standards established by
the Alabama Department of Public Health pursuant to Section
22-20-5.5."
Section 2. Section 22-20-5.5 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§22-20-5.5
(a) A food service establishment as defined in the
sanitation rules adopted by the Alabama Department of Public
Health shall include any cafeteria, canteen, commissary, or
other location that purchases or receives delivery of food for
storage, and prepares, stores, serves, or dispenses food in
individual portion size to inmates, which is operated by the
Department of Corrections or any county or municipality.
(b)(1) The Alabama Department of Public Health may
enforce existing rules that govern food service establishments
which may also be applied to facilities operated by the
Department of Corrections or a county or municipality as
described in subsection (a).
(2) The Alabama Department of Health shall adopt rules
Page 2

(2) The Alabama Department of Health shall adopt rules
SB84 INTRODUCED
that are appropriate for food service establishments operated
by the Department of Corrections and county and municipal
jails, to ensure the sanitary conditions of food storage,
preparation, and service, the enforcement of which shall be
under the jurisdiction of the health officer in the county
where the facility is located.
(3) Pursuant to subdivision (1), the Alabama Department
of Public Health shall consider the unique requirements and
limitations of correctional facilities and jails, and may
inspect food service establishments operated therein, identify
sanitary violations, issue scores, and prescribe corrective
action, but may not order the suspension or termination of any
food service establishment that is:
a. Operated by the Department of Corrections without
the agreement of the Commissioner of Corrections; or
b. Operated by a county or municipal jail without the
agreement of the governing body of the county or municipality.
(4) In any case in which the Department of Corrections,
or a county or municipality, contracts with a private
individual or entity to serve or dispense food in individual
portion size to inmates, the individual or entity shall remain
subject as a food service establishment to existing,
applicable sanitation rules of the Alabama Department of
Public Health.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3